Washington statutes.
RCW 12.40.100

Payment of monetary judgment.

If a monetary judgment or order is entered, it shall be the judgment debtor's duty to pay the judgment upon such terms and conditions as the judge shall prescribe. If the judgment is not paid to the prevailing party at the time the judgment is entered and the judgment debtor is present in court, the court may order a payment plan.

[ 1984 c 258 s 67; 1983 c 254 s 1; 1919 c 187 s 10; RRS s 1777-10.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Effective date—1983 c 254: "This act shall take effect on January 1, 1984." [ 1983 c 254 s 5.]